Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.480

Electronic wills—Certified paper copies.

An individual may create a certified paper copy of an electronic will by affirming under penalty of perjury that a paper copy of the electronic will is a complete, true, and accurate copy of the electronic will. If the electronic will is made self-proving, the certified paper copy of the will must include the self-proving affidavits.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1009.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.